Arkansas, session 2025, HB1645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1904(d)(2), concerning the prohibition
on advertising by a microbrewery-restaurant private club, is amended to read
as follows:
(2) The prohibition on advertising or promoting the consumption
and use of alcoholic beverages under subdivision (d)(1) of this section does
not apply to a:
(A) A microbrewery-restaurant private club advertisement
consisting solely of the name of the microbrewery-restaurant private club; or
(B) The use of social media, a website, or other
electronic means to provide information to a consumer regarding the
microbrewery-restaurant private club, including without limitation the
location, events, and menu.

/s/M. Brown

*CRH085*
03-13-2025 10:25:00 CRH085